src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON neuorgtag ! XXXcheck
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Prop+Neu: S_N_SGNA ;
 +N+Prop+Neu: S_N_SGDG ;
! eimskip


LEXICON ROMA
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
     +N+Prop+Sg+Nom:%>a  # ;
     +N+Prop+Sg+Acc:%>u  # ;
     +N+Prop+Sg+Dat:%>u  # ;
     +N+Prop+Sg+Gen:%>u  # ;

!LEXICON plcpl
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Nom:%>ar # ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Acc:%>ar # ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Dat:%>um # ;
! +N+Prop+Sg+Pl+Gen:%>a  # ;


LEXICON SUDUROY
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Indef:          # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+Indef:          # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Dat+Indef:          # ;
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar      # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>in      # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ina     # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni     # ;
   +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>arinnar # ;

LEXICON FLOKKUR
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 flokkur:flokk propnoun_org_k9 ;

! These are the lexica taken from the noun_fao_lex.txt file.

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt10
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h_flt10 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt25 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h_flt25 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt3 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h_flt3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h_flt8
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h_flt8 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h11
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h11 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h11e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h11e ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h22e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h2e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h11
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h11 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h11e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h11e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k13e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k13e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k11
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k11 ;


LEXICON propnoun_h13
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h13 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h13e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h13e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h1e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h24
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h24 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h24e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h24e ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h24e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h24e ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_h24
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: h24 ;


LEXICON propnoun_h25
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h25 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h25e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h25e ;

!LEXICON propnoun_plc_h3
! +Prop+Sem/Plc: h3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h3
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h3e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h3e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h4
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h4 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h4e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h4e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h5
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h5 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h5e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h5e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h6e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h6e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h9e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h9e ;

LEXICON propnoun_h8
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h8 ;

LEXICON propnoun_h8e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h8e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k_flt17
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k_flt17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k_flt1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k_flt1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k13e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k13e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k_flt20
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k_flt20 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k12
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k12 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k14
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k14 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k17
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k17
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k1e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k21
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k21 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k3
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k39e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k39e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k3e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k3e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k43e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k43e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k46
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k46 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k46e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k46e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k12_boe
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k12_boe ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k6
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k6e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k6e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k6
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k52
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k52 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k55
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Nom:a # ;
 +N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Acc:a # ;
 +N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Dat:a # ;
 +N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Gen:iar # ;
 +N+Prop+Msc+Sg+Acc:a R- ; ! compound

LEXICON propnoun_k6e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k6e ;
 
LEXICON propnoun_k7
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k7 ;

LEXICON propnoun_k8e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k8e ;

LEXICON propnoun_k8
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k8 ;
 
LEXICON propnoun_plc_k8e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k8e ;
 
LEXICON propnoun_k9
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k9 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_k9
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: k9 ;
 
LEXICON propnoun_k9e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k9e ;

LEXICON propnoun_org_k9
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Org: k9 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv_flt1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt17
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv_flt17 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv_flt2 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt32
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv_flt32 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt6
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv_flt6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv_flt9
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv_flt9 ;

LEXICON propnoun_org_kv1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Org: kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_kv1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_plc_kv1e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Plc: kv1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv1
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv1 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv12e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv12e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv13e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv13e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv1e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv1e ;

LEXICON propnoun_fem_kv2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop+Sem/Fem: kv2 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv2
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv2 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv21
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv21 ;

!LEXICON propnoun_plc_kv24e
! +Prop+Sem/Plc: kv24e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv2e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv2e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv3
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv3 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv32e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv32e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv3e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv3e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv6
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv6 ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv6e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv6e ;

!LEXICON propnoun_plc_kv6e
! +Prop+Sem/Plc: kv6e ;

LEXICON propnoun_kv9
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv9 ;
LEXICON propnoun_kv24e
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: kv24e ;
LEXICON propnoun_h15e 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h15e ;
LEXICON propnoun_h37 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: h37 ;
LEXICON propnoun_k10e 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k10e ;
LEXICON propnoun_k15e 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k15e ;
LEXICON propnoun_k21e 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k21e ;
LEXICON propnoun_k36 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k36 ;
LEXICON propnoun_k48 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k48 ;
LEXICON propnoun_k52e 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Prop: k52e ;
!LEXICON propnoun_plc_h3e 
! +Prop: h3e ;
!LEXICON propnoun_plc_kv24e/6e 
! +Prop: kv24e/6e ;
!LEXICON propnoun_plc_kv6 
! +Prop: kv6 ;
